North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 34. Parental Authority over Juveniles.

§ 7B-3400.
Juvenile under 18 subject to parents’ control.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any juvenile under 18 years of age, except as provided in

G.S. 7B-3402

and

G.S. 7B-3403

, shall be subject to the supervision and control of the juvenile’s parents.

History.

1969, c. 1080, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6.

§ 7B-3401.
Definitions.

The definitions of

G.S. 7B-101

and

G.S. 7B-1501

apply to this Subchapter.

History.

1998-202, s. 6.

§ 7B-3402.
Exceptions.

This Article shall not apply to any juvenile under the age of 18 who is married or who is serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, or who has been emancipated.

History.

1969, c. 1080, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 2011-183, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 6, effective June 20, 2011, substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed forces.”

§ 7B-3403.
No criminal liability created.

This Article shall not be interpreted to place any criminal liability on a parent, guardian, or custodian for any act of the juvenile 16 years of age or older.

History.

1969, c. 1080, s. 3; 1998-202, s. 6.

§ 7B-3404.
Enforcement.

The provisions of this Article may be enforced by the parent, guardian, custodian, or person who has assumed the status and obligation of a parent without being awarded legal custody of the juvenile by a court to the juvenile by filing a civil action in the district court of the county where the juvenile can be found or the county of the plaintiff’s residence. Upon the institution of such action by a verified complaint, alleging that the defendant juvenile has left home or has left the place where the juvenile has been residing and refuses to return and comply with the direction and control of the plaintiff, the court may issue an order directing the juvenile personally to appear before the court at a specified time to be heard in answer to the allegations of the plaintiff and to comply with further orders of the court. Such orders shall be served by the sheriff upon the juvenile and upon any other person named as a party defendant in such action. At the time of the issuance of the order directing the juvenile to appear, the court may in the same order, or by separate order, order the sheriff to enter any house, building, structure, or conveyance for the purpose of searching for the juvenile and serving the order and for the purpose of taking custody of the person of the juvenile in order to bring the juvenile before the court. Any order issued at said hearing shall be treated as a mandatory injunction and shall remain in full force and effect until the juvenile reaches the age of 18, or until further orders of the court. Within 30 days after the hearing on the original order, the juvenile, or anyone acting in the juvenile’s behalf, may file a verified answer to the complaint. Upon the filing of an answer by or on behalf of the juvenile, any district court judge holding court in the county or district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

where the action was instituted shall have jurisdiction to hear the matter, without a jury, and to make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and render judgment thereon. Appeals from the district court to the Court of Appeals shall be allowed as in civil actions generally. The district court issuing the original order or the district court hearing the matter after answer has been filed shall also have authority to order that any person named defendant in the order or judgment shall not harbor, keep, or allow the defendant juvenile to remain on the person’s premises or in the person’s home. Failure of any defendant to comply with the terms of said order or judgment shall be punishable as for contempt.

History.

1969, c. 1080, s. 4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 108; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1031, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6.